Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2517
Occupational therapist; therapy assistant; temporary license; applicability of section.

(1) A person who has applied to take the examination under section 38-2518 or 38-2519 and who has completed the education and experience requirements of the Occupational Therapy Practice Act may be granted a temporary license to practice as an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant. A temporary license shall allow the person to practice only in association with an occupational therapist.

(2) A temporary license expires the earlier of: (a) The date the person holding the temporary license is issued a permanent license; (b) the date the board denies a person's license application; (c) one hundred eighty days after the date the temporary license is issued; or (d) the date a person is notified of a failure of the licensure examination. The temporary license shall not be renewed if the applicant has failed the examination. The temporary license may be extended by the department, with the recommendation of the board.

(3) In no case may a temporary license be extended for a period greater than one year after the date of issuance.

(4) This section does not apply to a temporary license issued as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 33;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 175;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-6105;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 857;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 82;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 13.